Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 526.031 is amended to read:
526.031. [(1) The State Board of Forestry shall appoint a  State Forester, who must be a practical
forester familiar with western conditions and experienced  in organization for the prevention of forest
fires. The forester shall be the chief executive officer of the  State Forestry Department. The forester
shall hold office at the pleasure of the board, and shall act as its secretary. ]
(1) The Governor shall  appoint a State Forester subject to Senate confirmation under
ORS 171.562 and 171.565.  The forester shall be the chief executive officer of the State
Forestry Department and shall act as the  secretary of the State Board of Forestry. The
forester shall serve a term of four years at the pleasure of the Governor  and shall be eligible
for reappointment.
(2)(a) With the approval of the board and subject to  applicable provisions of the State Personnel
Relations Law, the State  Forester may appoint a Deputy State Forester, assistant state foresters and
other employees of the department.
(b) The State Forester must have organizational management experience  and either of
the following:
(A) Executive experience and expertise overseeing  forest and wildfire management on
western forestlands; or
(B) Operational experience and expertise overseeing forest and  wildfire management on
western forestlands.
(c) During the State Forester’s  absence or disability, all authority shall be exercised by the
Deputy State Forester [ or by  the assistant whom the State Forester or the board, by written order filed
with the Secretary of State, has designated as Acting State Forester ].
[(3) The board shall fix the compensation of the State Forester.  In addition to their salaries, the
forester, the deputy and assistants shall be reimbursed,  subject to the limitations otherwise provided
by law, for their actual and necessary travel and other expenses incurred in the performance of their
duties.]
(3)(a) The State Forester shall receive a salary as provided by law or, if not so provided,
as prescribed by the Governor.
(b) In addition to salary, but subject to any applicable law regulating travel and  other
expenses of state officers and employees, the State Forester, the Deputy State Forester  and
assistant state foresters shall be reimbursed for actual and necessary travel and other  ex-
Enrolled Senate Bill 1051 (SB 1051-A) Page 1
penses incurred by the State Forester, the Deputy State Forester and  assistant state
foresters in the performance of official duties.
SECTION 2. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate June 18, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 26, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1051 (SB 1051-A) Page 2